District of Columbia statutes.
22-3810

Stay of criminal proceedings.

Any statement filed in a criminal proceeding pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of § 22-3804 shall stay such criminal proceeding until whichever of the following first occurs:

(1)

The proceeding under this chapter to determine whether the patient is a sexual psychopath is dismissed pursuant to § 22-3807 or withdrawn;

(2)

It is determined pursuant to § 22-3808 that the patient is not a sexual psychopath; or

(3)

The patient is discharged from an institution pursuant to § 22-3809.

History

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 349, ch. 428, title II, § 208
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(t)(3)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3510.
1973 Ed., § 22-3510.